Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 6. Loans Other Than Consumer Loans

§ 40-14-354.
Loans subject to provisions by agreement of parties.

The parties to a loan other than a consumer loan may agree in a writing signed by the parties that the loan is subject to the provisions of this act applying to consumer loans. If the parties so agree, the loan is a consumer loan for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-601; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-601.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.

§ 40-14-355.
Definition of “consumer related loan”; finance charge. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-602; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-602; Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-356.
Applicability of other provisions to consumer related loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-603; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-603; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-357.
Limitation on default charges in consumer related loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-604; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-604; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-358.
Loan finance charge for other loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-605; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-605; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.